Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-4930
Transfer of project.

A project covered by an agreement may be transferred in its entirety by sale or lease to another person or in an acquisition of assets qualifying under section 381 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended. The acquiring persons shall be entitled to the same benefits as the original company and shall be subject to the same obligations, including recapture and disallowance, as the original company.

Laws 1995, LB 829, § 30.